Wisconsin, session 2025, AB40.
do enact as follows:AB40,11Section 1. 20.005 (3) (schedule) of the statutes: at the appropriate place, 2insert the following amounts for the purposes indicated: - See PDF for table AB40,27Section 2. 20.455 (2) (fc) of the statutes is created to read:AB40,2,9820.455 (2) (fc) School safety competitive grants. Biennially, the amounts in the 9schedule for grants under 2025 Wisconsin Act .... (this act), section 4 (1).AB40,310Section 3. 20.455 (2) (fc) of the statutes, as created by 2025 Wisconsin Act .... 11(this act), is repealed.AB40,412Section 4. Nonstatutory provisions.AB40,2,1313(1) School safety competitive grant program.AB40,2,1414(a) In this subsection:AB40,2,15151. “Office” means the office of school safety in the department of justice.AB40,2,16162. “Private school” has the meaning given in s. 115.001 (3r).AB40,2,17173. “Public school” has the meaning given in s. 115.01 (1).AB40,2,18184. “Tribal school” has the meaning given in s. 115.001 (15m).AB40,2,2119(b) 1. The office shall establish a competitive grant program to award grants 20to public, private, and tribal schools to improve the safety of school buildings and to 21provide security training to school personnel.AB40,2,23222. In awarding grants under this paragraph, the office shall give preference to 23applicants that have not received a grant under s. 165.88.AB40,3,213. The office may not award more than $20,000 to an applicant under the 2program established under subd. 1.AB40,3,63(c) By July 31, 2026, and July 31, 2027, the office shall submit a report to the 4cochairpersons of the joint committee on finance providing an account of the grants 5awarded under this subsection during the previous fiscal year and the expenditures 6made with the grant moneys.AB40,3,77(d) No grants may be awarded under this subsection after June 30, 2027.AB40,58Section 5. Effective dates. This act takes effect on the day after 9publication, or on the 2nd day after publication of the 2025 biennial budget act, 10whichever is later, except as follows:AB40,3,1211(1) School safety grants. The repeal of s. 20.455 (2) (fc) takes effect on July 121, 2027.AB40,3,1313